Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6403
Affiliated insurer, defined.

Affiliated insurer shall mean an insurer who directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person.

Laws 1986, LB 573, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-576;

Laws 1994, LB 1074, § 3.